District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

15-131

Judgments and executions generally; interest

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(4)(A)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 15-131 to 15-133.